Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2917
Signing of records to be delivered for filing to the Secretary of State.

Records delivered to the Secretary of State for filing pursuant to the Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act shall be signed in the following manner:

(1) The initial articles of organization shall be signed by at least one organizer;

(2) A notice of cancellation under section 21-29,108 shall be signed by each organizer that signed the initial articles of organization;

(3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a record signed on behalf of an existing limited cooperative association shall be signed by an officer or authorized representative; and

(4) A record filed on behalf of a dissolved limited cooperative association by a person winding up the activities under section 21-2989 or a person appointed under such section to wind up those activities.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 17.